Nebraska, session 109, LB1121.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 35 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act.
Sec. 2. The Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act applies to
agreements between dealers and manufacturers that are entered into on or
after the operative date of this act.
Sec. 3. The Legislature declares that:
(1) The public health, safety, and welfare of the residents of this
state can be protected by regulating the relationship between dealers and
manufacturers, maintaining competition between dealers and manufacturers,
and providing consumer protection and fair trade for the purchase and
consumer care of recreational vehicles; and
(2) The recreational vehicle industry operates differently than the
motor vehicle industry in certain respects and these differences should
be reflected in franchise law to serve the needs of consumers, dealers,
manufacturers, distributors, and warrantors.
Sec. 4. For purposes of the Recreational Vehicle Industry
Regulation Act:
(1) Area of sales responsibility means the geographical area agreed
to by the dealer and the manufacturer in the manufacturer-dealer
agreement, within which the dealer has the exclusive right to display or
sell the manufacturer's new recreational vehicles of a particular line-
make;
(2) Board has the same meaning as in section 60-1401.06;
(3)(a) Bona fide consumer means an owner of a recreational vehicle
that has:
(i) Acquired such recreational vehicle for use in business or for
pleasure purposes;
(ii) Been granted a certificate of title for such recreational
vehicle; and
(iii) Registered such recreational vehicle in accordance with the
laws of the residence of the owner; and
-2-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
(b) Bona fide consumer does not include any owner that sells more
than eight registered recreational vehicles within a twelve-month period;
(4) Consumer care means the performance, for the public, of
necessary maintenance and repairs to recreational vehicles, including
diagnostic work and warranty service;
(5) Dealer means any individual who or business entity that is
licensed under the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act to sell
new recreational vehicles;
(6) Distributor means any individual or business entity that
purchases new recreational vehicles for resale to dealers;
(7) Factory campaign means an effort on the part of a warrantor to
contact recreational vehicle owners or dealers in order to address a part
or equipment issue;
(8) Family member means a spouse or, whether by blood, marriage, or
adoption, a child, grandchild, parent, sibling, niece, or nephew, or the
spouse of any such person;
(9) Licensee means a person that holds a license issued under the
Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act;
(10) Line-make means a specific series of recreational vehicles
that:
(a) Are targeted to a particular market segment, as determined by
their decor, features, equipment, size, weight, and price range;
(b) Have lengths and interior floor plans that distinguish the line-
make from other line-makes with substantially the same decor, equipment,
features, price, and weight; and
(c) Belong to a single, distinct classification of recreational
vehicles that have a substantial degree of commonality in the
construction of the chassis, frame, and body;
(11) Manufacturer means any individual or business entity that
engages in the manufacturing of recreational vehicles;
(12) Manufacturer-dealer agreement means a written agreement or
-3-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
contract entered into between a manufacturer or distributor and a dealer
that specifies the rights and responsibilities of the parties to the
agreement and authorizes the dealer to sell line-makes of new
recreational vehicles that are manufactured by the manufacturer;
(13) Model means a series of recreational vehicles that are
identified by a trade name or trademark that is a subset of a line-make;
(14) Motor vehicle dealer has the same meaning as in section
60-1401.26;
(15) Motorcycle dealer has the same meaning as in section
60-1401.29;
(16) New recreational vehicle means any recreational vehicle that is
not included within the definition of a used recreational vehicle;
(17) Proprietary part means any part that is manufactured by or for
and sold exclusively by the manufacturer;
(18)(a) Recreational vehicle means a vehicle that is either self-
propelled or towed by a consumer-owned tow vehicle and that is designed
to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel
use; and
(b) Recreational vehicle includes motor homes, travel trailers,
fifth wheel travel trailers, truck campers, and folding camping trailers;
(19) Termination action means the termination of, cancellation of,
or failure to renew an entire manufacturer-dealer agreement or any
provision relating to any model or line-make in a manufacturer-dealer
agreement;
(20) Trailer dealer has the same meaning as in section 60-1401.37;
(21) Transient customer means a customer who is temporarily
traveling through a dealer's area of sales responsibility;
(22)(a) Used recreational vehicle means every recreational vehicle
that has been sold, bargained, exchanged, or given away or for which
title has been transferred from the person who first acquired it from the
manufacturer, distributor, or dealer.
-4-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
(b) A new recreational vehicle is not considered a used recreational
vehicle until it has been placed in use by a bona fide consumer or until
it has been registered under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act by a bona
fide consumer;
(23) Warrantor means any individual or business entity that provides
a warranty in connection with a new recreational vehicle or parts,
accessories, or components for a new recreational vehicle. Such warranty
does not include the following that are sold for separate consideration
by a dealer or other person not controlled by a manufacturer: Any service
contract, mechanical or other insurance, and extended warranty;
(24) Warranty part means a part, accessory, or component of a
recreational vehicle that is covered by a warranty that was issued by a
warrantor; and
(25) Warranty service means consumer care that is provided under the
terms of or to comply with a warranty.
Sec. 5. (1) The board may:
(a) Regulate the issuance and revocation of licenses in accordance
with and subject to the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act;
(b) Perform all acts and duties provided for in the Recreational
Vehicle Industry Regulation Act that are necessary to the administration
and enforcement of the act;
(c) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relating to the
administration of but not inconsistent with the Recreational Vehicle
Industry Regulation Act;
(d) Enforce rules and regulations that were adopted and promulgated
by the board; and
(e) Employ a hearing officer who shall conduct preliminary hearings
on behalf of the board and make recommendations to the board on any issue
or matter that the board deems proper.
(2) The seal of the board shall be used to authenticate the acts of
the board. Copies of all records and papers in the office of the board
-5-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
under the hand and seal of the office shall be received in evidence in
all cases equally and with like effect as the original.
(3) Investigators employed by the board may enter upon and inspect
the facilities, the required records, and any recreational vehicles found
in any licensee's established place or places of business.
(4) With respect to any action taken by the board, if a controlling
number of the members of the board are active participants in the
recreational vehicle market in which the action is taken, the chairperson
shall review the action taken and, upon completion of such review,
modify, alter, approve, or reject the board's action.
Sec. 6. (1) Licenses issued by the board under the Recreational
Vehicle Industry Regulation Act shall be of the classes set out in this
section and shall permit the business activities described in this
section:
(a) Recreational vehicle dealer license. This license permits:
(i) The selling or exchanging of new recreational vehicles at:
(A) Any established place of business designated in the license;
(B) Another place or places of business located within three hundred
feet of such designated place of business; and
(C) Any place within the county described in the license; and
(ii) Either the individual owner of the business or one stockholder
in, member in, partner in, or officer of the business, to act as a
recreational vehicle salesperson and the name of the one authorized
person shall appear on the license;
(b) Manufacturer license. This license:
(i) Permits the licensee to engage in the activities of a
manufacturer; and
(ii) Prohibits the licensee from directly or indirectly owning an
interest in, operating, controlling, or acting in the capacity of any:
(A) Franchised dealer or franchised dealership for the same line-
make of recreational vehicle that is manufactured by the licensee; or
-6-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
(B) Nonfranchised dealer or dealership; and
(c) Distributor license. This license:
(i) Permits the licensee to engage in the activities of a
distributor; and
(ii) Prohibits the licensee from directly or indirectly owning an
interest in, operating, controlling, or acting in the capacity of any:
(A) Franchised dealer or franchised dealership for the same line-
make of recreational vehicle that is distributed by the licensee; or
(B) Nonfranchised dealer or dealership.
(2) For purposes of this section, a dealer or dealership is
controlled by a manufacturer or distributor if such manufacturer or
distributor is directly or indirectly authorized, by law or by an
agreement of the parties, to direct or influence the management or
policies of the dealer or dealership.
Sec. 7. Any person may apply for one or more of the classes of
licenses described in section 6 of this act. Such application shall be
prescribed by the board and contain the following information:
(1)(a) If the applicant is an individual, the name and address of
the applicant, the applicant's social security number, and the name under
which the applicant intends to conduct business;
(b) If the applicant is a partnership or limited liability company,
the name and address of each partner or member, the social security
number of each partner or member, and the name under which the applicant
intends to conduct business; or
(c) If the applicant is not an individual, a partnership, or a
limited liability company, the applicant's name, the name and address of
each of the applicant's principal officers, and the name under which the
applicant intends to conduct business;
(2)(a) The address of each place where the applicant intends to
conduct business, (b) a statement whether the applicant owns or leases
each such place, (c) for each such place that is leased, a true and
-7-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
correct copy of the lease agreement, and (d) a description of the
facilities for the display of recreational vehicles;
(3) If the application is for a recreational vehicle dealer license,
the name and address of the individual who is to act as the salesperson
under such license if issued;
(4) If the application is for a manufacturer license or a
distributor license, a statement regarding the manufacturer's or
distributor's compliance with the Recreational Vehicle Industry
Regulation Act; and
(5) A statement that the applicant will comply with and be subject
to the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, the rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated by the board, and any amendments to
such act and such rules and regulations.
Sec. 8. (1) Only a dealer may sell a new recreational vehicle in
this state to a bona fide consumer.
(2) A manufacturer or distributor shall not sell a new recreational
vehicle in this state to or through a dealer without having first entered
into a manufacturer-dealer agreement with such dealer. Any such agreement
shall be signed by both parties.
(3) A motor vehicle dealer, motorcycle dealer, or trailer dealer
shall not sell a new recreational vehicle in this state without becoming
licensed as a dealer under the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation
Act.
(4) This section applies beginning on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 9. (1) A manufacturer-dealer agreement shall include:
(a) A designation of the area of sales responsibility assigned to
the dealer;
(b) The timeframe for inspection and refusal to take delivery of a
recreational vehicle by the dealer pursuant to section 31 of this act.
Such timeframe shall not be less than two business days after the
physical delivery of the recreational vehicle;
-8-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
(c) The terms of the manufacturer-dealer agreement; and
(d) The duration of the manufacturer-dealer agreement.
(2) A manufacturer-dealer agreement shall not:
(a) Include any provision that requires a party to violate the
Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act. Any such provision is null
and void;
(b) Provide for the sale of a model or line-make that is already
authorized to be sold by another dealer in the same area of sales
responsibility; or
(c) Be changed during the duration of the manufacturer-dealer
agreement without the written mutual consent of the parties, including
the area of sales responsibility.
(3) A manufacturer shall not issue a policy or procedure that
violates or substantially alters a provision of a manufacturer-dealer
agreement during the duration of such agreement without the written
mutual consent of the parties.
Sec. 10. (1) When a manufacturer distributes new recreational
vehicles to any dealer under the terms of a manufacturer-dealer
agreement, such distribution shall be in a fair and equitable manner.
(2) Any such dealer may request information on the manner of
distribution from such manufacturer. Such request shall be made in
writing and delivered to the headquarters of the manufacturer. Upon
receipt of such request, such manufacturer shall provide such information
to the headquarters of the dealer in written form within thirty business
days after receipt of such request.
Sec. 11. A manufacturer shall provide each dealer with which the
manufacturer has executed a current manufacturer-dealer agreement with
adequate technical data so that the dealer can perform consumer care and
repairs on the recreational vehicles that were manufactured by the
manufacturer and sold by the dealer.
Sec. 12. (1) A manufacturer or distributor shall not initiate a
-9-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
termination action, including directly or through any officer, agent, or
employee of such manufacturer or distributor, unless at least one reason
showing that good cause exists for such termination action.
(2) A manufacturer or distributor that initiates a termination
action has the burden of showing good cause for such termination action.
For purposes of determining reasons showing that good cause exists for a
manufacturer or distributor to initiate a termination action, any of the
following factors may be considered:
(a) The extent of the affected dealer's penetration in the relevant
market area for the relevant model or line-make;
(b) The nature and extent of the dealer's investment in the dealer's
business;
(c) The adequacy of the dealer's service facilities, equipment,
parts, supplies, and personnel;
(d) The effect of the termination action on the community;
(e) The extent and quality of the dealer's service under
recreational vehicle warranties;
(f) The failure to follow agreed-upon, reasonable procedures or
standards related to the overall operation of the dealership consistent
with the law and the manufacturer-dealer agreement;
(g) The dealer's performance under the terms of the manufacturer-
dealer agreement;
(h) The dealer or one of its owners being convicted of, or entering
a plea of nolo contendere to, a felony;
(i) The abandonment or closing of the business operations of the
dealer for ten consecutive business days unless the closing is due to an
act of God, strike, labor difficulty, or other cause over which the
dealer has no control;
(j) A significant misrepresentation by the dealer that materially
affects the business relationship between the manufacturer or distributor
and the dealer; and
-10-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
(k) A suspension, revocation, or nonrenewal of the dealer's
recreational vehicle dealer license under the Recreational Vehicle
Industry Regulation Act.
Sec. 13. (1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section, a manufacturer or distributor shall provide the dealer with a
written notice that states the manufacturer's or distributor's intent to
initiate a termination action.
(b) Such written notice shall be delivered to the headquarters of
the dealer at least:
(i) One hundred twenty days prior to the intended termination
action; or
(ii) Thirty days prior to the intended termination action if the
reasons showing that good cause exists for initiating a termination
action include any reason under subdivisions (2)(h) though (k) of section
12 of this act.
(c) Such written notice shall state:
(i) Each reason showing that good cause exists for the proposed
termination action;
(ii) The date of the proposed termination action; and
(iii) That, within thirty days after receiving the notice, the
dealer may provide to the manufacturer or distributor a written notice of
intent to cure each reason stated for the proposed termination action.
Such notice of intent to cure shall be delivered to the headquarters of
the manufacturer or distributor.
(2)(a) For a dealer that provides the notice described in
subdivision (1)(c)(iii) of this section, such dealer has ninety days
after such notice was received by the manufacturer or distributor to cure
each reason stated for the proposed termination action.
(b) If each reason for the proposed termination action is cured as
specified in subdivision (2)(a) of this section, the manufacturer or
distributor shall not initiate the proposed termination action.
-11-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
(3) For a dealer that does not provide the notice described in
subdivision (1)(c)(iii) of this section, the manufacturer or distributor
may initiate the proposed termination action on the date stated in the
written notice provided by the manufacturer or distributor pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A manufacturer or distributor does not need to provide written
notice to a dealer of a proposed termination action if the dealer is
experiencing insolvency, the occurrence of an assignment for the benefit
of creditors, or bankruptcy.
Sec. 14. (1) A dealer may initiate a termination action with a
manufacturer or distributor with or without good cause at any time by
providing a written notice of the termination action to the manufacturer
or distributor. Such written notice shall be delivered to the
headquarters of the manufacturer or distributor at least thirty days
prior to the date of the termination action.
(2) A dealer that initiates a termination action for good cause has
the burden of showing good cause for such termination action. For
purposes of determining good cause under this section, any of the
following factors may be considered:
(a) The manufacturer or distributor being convicted of, or entering
a plea of nolo contendere to, a felony;
(b) The business operations of the manufacturer or distributor being
abandoned or closed for ten consecutive business days, unless the closing
is due to any act of God, strike, labor difficulty, or other cause over
which the manufacturer or distributor has no control;
(c) A significant misrepresentation by the manufacturer or
distributor that materially affects the business relationship between the
dealer and the manufacturer or distributor;
(d) A material violation of the Recreational Vehicle Industry
Regulation Act by the manufacturer or distributor that is not cured
within thirty days after receipt of the written notice that is provided
-12-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
by the dealer to the headquarters of the manufacturer or distributor;
(e) A declaration by the manufacturer or distributor of bankruptcy,
insolvency, or the occurrence of an assignment for the benefit of
creditors;
(f) A material violation of the manufacturer-dealer agreement by the
manufacturer that is not cured within one hundred twenty days after
written notice that is provided by the dealer to the headquarters of the
manufacturer;
(g) Coercion of the dealer by the manufacturer or distributor; and
(h) A violation by the manufacturer or distributor of the area of
sales responsibility specified in the manufacturer-dealer agreement or
allowing other dealers to violate such area of sales responsibility.
Sec. 15. (1) This section applies to any termination action that is
initiated when a manufacturer terminates without good cause or a dealer
terminates with good cause:
(a) Not in accordance with section 13 of this act by a manufacturer
or distributor;
(b) Pursuant to subsection (3) of section 13 of this act; or
(c) Pursuant to section 14 of this act.
(2) At the election of the dealer and within forty-five days after
the date of the termination action, the manufacturer or distributor shall
repurchase:
(a) All new, untitled recreational vehicles that were acquired by
the dealer from the manufacturer or distributor within the eighteen-month
period prior to the date of the termination action. Any such recreational
vehicles shall not have not been used except for demonstration purposes
and shall not have not been altered. Such recreational vehicles shall be
purchased at one hundred percent of the original net invoice cost,
including transportation and less applicable rebates and discounts
provided to the dealer. If any such recreational vehicle that is
repurchased is damaged prior to purchase, the repurchase amount due to
-13-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
the dealer shall be reduced by the cost to repair such damaged
recreational vehicle;
(b) All undamaged accessories and proprietary parts sold to the
dealer by the manufacturer or distributor for resale within the twelve-
month period prior to the date of the termination action. Any such
accessories and proprietary parts shall be accompanied by their original
invoice. Such accessories and parts shall be repurchased at one hundred
five percent of the original net invoice price; and
(c) Any properly functioning diagnostic equipment, special tools,
current signage, and other equipment and machinery, that (i) was
originally purchased by the dealer within five years before the date of
the termination action, (ii) was originally purchased upon the
manufacturer's or distributor's request, and (iii) can no longer be used
in the normal course of the dealer's ongoing business. The manufacturer
or distributor shall pay to the dealer one hundred percent of the net
cost that the dealer paid to acquire such equipment, tools, signage, and
machinery. The manufacturer or distributor shall reimburse the dealer for
any freight, destination, delivery, and distribution charges and sales
taxes, if any, related to the original purchase and the repurchase of
such equipment, tools, signage, and machinery.
(3) Any repurchased recreational vehicle shall be paid for in full
before such recreational vehicle is removed from the dealer's premises.
After payment in full and upon the request of the manufacturer or
distributor, such recreational vehicle shall be immediately surrendered
to the manufacturer or distributor.
Sec. 16. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Recreational
Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, if any recreational vehicle of a model
or line-make that is the subject of a termination agreement is not
repurchased or required to be repurchased by the manufacturer or
distributor, a dealer may sell the remaining inventory of such model or
line-make or any accessory or part for such model or line-make that such
-14-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
dealer has in stock.
Sec. 17. (1) Prior to entering a new manufacturer-dealer agreement
to sell a same line-make, a dealer shall provide written notice to each
manufacturer and distributor with which the dealer has a manufacturer-
dealer agreement.
(2) Such written notice shall:
(a) Be provided to the headquarters of the manufacturer or
distributor at least thirty days prior to entering the new manufacturer-
dealer agreement;
(b) Specify that the dealer will be entering a new manufacturer-
dealer agreement;
(c) Specify the line-make that is the subject of the new
manufacturer-dealer agreement; and
(d) Specify the length of time that the new manufacturer-dealer
agreement will be effective.
Sec. 18. A manufacturer-dealer agreement that has been renewed
shall not require additional inventory stocking requirements or increased
retail sales targets in excess of the market growth in the dealer's area
of sales responsibility.
Sec. 19. (1) A dealer shall provide written notice to each
manufacturer and distributor with which the manufacturer is currently
under a manufacturer-dealer agreement that such dealer intends to change
ownership by any manner, including the sale of assets of the dealer and a
stock transfer. Such written notice shall be provided at least ten
business days before the change of ownership to the headquarters of each
such manufacturer and distributor.
(2)(a) Within three business days after receiving a written notice
under this section, a manufacturer or distributor may request the dealer
to provide any supporting documentation that is required by the
manufacturer or distributor to determine if such manufacturer or
distributor will object to the change in ownership.
-15-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
(b) Any such requested supporting documentation shall be provided by
the dealer within three business days after receiving the request for
such supporting documentation.
Sec. 20. (1) A manufacturer or distributor shall not object to a
change in ownership of a dealer unless:
(a) The change in ownership would breach the manufacturer-dealer
agreement;
(b) The dealer failed to provide any requested supporting
documentation under section 19 of this act;
(c) The prospective transferee:
(i) Has been terminated for cause in a termination action initiated
by the manufacturer under a previous manufacturer-dealer agreement;
(ii) Has been convicted of a felony or any crime of fraud, deceit,
or moral turpitude;
(iii) Lacks any license necessary to own and operate the dealership
under the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act;
(iv) Does not have an active line of credit that is sufficient to
purchase the manufacturer's or distributor's products under the
manufacturer-dealer agreement; or
(v) Within the ten years prior to the date of receipt of the written
notice provided under section 19 of this act, has undergone bankruptcy,
insolvency, a general assignment for the benefit of creditors, or the
appointment of a receiver, trustee, or conservator to take possession of
the transferee's business or property; or
(d) If the prospective transferee is a family member of the dealer,
such family member intends to do any of the following without the consent
of the manufacturer or distributor:
(i) Relocate the dealership to any location; or
(ii) Alter the terms or conditions of the manufacturer-dealer
agreement.
(2) If the manufacturer or distributor objects to a change of
-16-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
ownership, the manufacturer or distributor shall provide written notice
of its reasons for the objection to the dealer within seven business days
after receipt of the written notification provided by the dealer under
section 19 of this act. The manufacturer or distributor has the burden of
proof with regard to its objection.
(3) If a manufacturer or distributor does not object to the change
in ownership pursuant to this section, the change in ownership shall be
deemed approved by such manufacturer or distributor.
Sec. 21. A warrantor shall:
(1) Specify a dealer's obligations, if any, for preparation,
delivery, and consumer care on products that are under warranty by the
warrantor. Any such obligations shall be specified in writing;
(2) Compensate a dealer for consumer care that is (i) performed by
such dealer and (ii) covered by a warranty issued by the warrantor;
(3) Create a schedule of compensation and provide such schedule to
each dealer that is authorized by the warrantor to perform warranty
service; and
(4) Whenever the warrantor modifies a schedule of compensation,
provide such updated schedule of compensation to each dealer that is
authorized by the warrantor to perform warranty service.
Sec. 22. (1) A schedule of compensation that is created or modified
by a warrantor shall include the:
(a) Reasonable compensation that will be paid by the warrantor to
the dealer for performing consumer care. Such compensation shall not be
less than the lowest retail labor rate actually charged by the dealer in
the ordinary course of business for like nonwarranty consumer care; and
(b) Reasonable time allowances for the performance of consumer care.
(2)(a) Any particular consumer care that is performed by a dealer
and that is not included in a schedule of compensation shall be paid by
the warrantor at the actual time expended to complete the consumer care.
(b) A warrantor may dispute a payment required by subdivision (a) of
-17-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
this subsection. A warrantor that disputes any such payment shall:
(i) Demonstrate that the actual time claimed by the dealer to
perform the consumer care was not reasonable; and
(ii) Pay the dealer a reasonable sum for the performance of the
consumer care.
(c) The burden of proof for any dispute under this subsection lies
with the warrantor.
Sec. 23. A dealer that replaces a warranty part shall be paid the
following by the warrantor that issued the warranty for such warranty
part:
(1) The actual wholesale cost paid by the dealer for the warranty
part;
(2) A handling charge equal to the lesser amount of:
(a) Thirty percent of the actual wholesale cost paid by the dealer
for the warranty part. If a part is sent to the dealer at no cost, the
warrantor shall pay to the dealer an amount equal to thirty percent of
the wholesale cost of the part; or
(b) Three hundred dollars; and
(3) The freight cost to ship to the warrantor the part that was
replaced, if the warrantor requests for such part to be shipped to the
warrantor.
Sec. 24. A warrantor may ship parts to the dealer so that such
dealer will be able to carry out factory campaign work. If such parts are
in excess of a dealer's requirements, the dealer may return the unused
parts to the warrantor for credit after completion of the factory
campaign.
Sec. 25. A dealer shall notify the warrantor as soon as reasonably
possible, verbally or in writing, if the dealer is unable or unwilling to
perform material or repetitive consumer care.
Sec. 26. (1) A warrantor may conduct a warranty audit of any dealer
that requests warranty compensation from the warrantor.
-18-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
(2) A warrantor may conduct such warranty audits for any number of
such dealers, but not more often for each such dealer than three months
since the last warranty audit conducted by such warrantor.
Sec. 27. (1) A dealer shall submit a warranty compensation claim
within forty-five days after completing consumer care relating to the
compensation claim. Such claim shall be in the manner and form prescribed
by the warrantor.
(2) A request by a dealer for payment of warranty compensation shall
not be denied except for cause, including performance of nonwarranty
repairs, material noncompliance with the warrantor's published policies
and procedures, lack of material documentation, fraud, and
misrepresentation.
(3) A warrantor shall provide written notice to the dealer for any
warranty claim that the warrantor denies. Such written notice shall be
provided to the headquarters of the dealer within forty-five days after
the date of submission for payment of warranty compensation by the
dealer.
(4) Any claim that is not denied pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section shall be deemed to be approved and shall be paid within sixty
days after the date of submission for payment of warranty compensation by
the dealer.
Sec. 28. A warrantor shall not:
(1) Fail to perform any of its warranty obligations;
(2) Fail to include, in any written notice of a factory campaign
that is provided to any recreational vehicle owner or dealer, the
expected date when necessary parts and equipment, including tires,
chassis, and chassis parts, will be available to dealers to perform
factory campaign work;
(3) Fail to compensate a dealer for authorized consumer care that
was completed by the dealer relating to merchandise that was damaged:
(a) During the manufacturing process; or
-19-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
(b) During transit to the dealer, if the carrier that provided
transit was designated by the warrantor, factory branch, distributor, or
distributor branch;
(4) Fail to compensate a dealer for authorized warranty service in
accordance with the time allowances set forth in the schedule of
compensation, if such warranty service was performed in a timely and
competent manner;
(5) Intentionally misrepresent in any way to any purchaser of a
recreational vehicle that any warranty with respect to the manufacture,
performance, or design of the recreational vehicle is made by the dealer
as a warrantor or co-warrantor; or
(6) Require the dealer to make any warranty to any customer in any
manner related to the manufacture of a recreational vehicle.
Sec. 29. A dealer shall not:
(1) Fail to perform predelivery inspection functions, as specified
by the warrantor, in a competent and timely manner;
(2) Fail to perform warranty service that is authorized by a
warrantor in a reasonably competent and timely manner on any transient
customer's recreational vehicle if such recreational vehicle is the same
line-make sold by the dealer. This subdivision does not apply if the
dealer determines that the transient customer is acting in a manner
detrimental to the dealer's business;
(3) Fail to track actual time expended to perform warranty service
that is not governed by time allowances in the schedule of compensation;
(4) Claim an agency relationship with a warrantor or a manufacturer;
or
(5) Misrepresent the terms of any warranty.
Sec. 30. (1)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d) of this
subsection, a warrantor shall not fail to indemnify, defend, and hold
harmless a dealer that performed warranty service on behalf of such
warrantor against any loss or damage to the extent such loss or damage
-20-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
was caused by the negligence or willful misconduct of such warrantor.
(b) Except as provided in subdivision (d) of this subsection, such
dealer shall not be denied indemnification by such warrantor or a defense
against such warrantor for failing to discover, disclose, or remedy a
defect in the design or manufacturing of a recreational vehicle.
(c) Such dealer shall provide to such warrantor a copy of the
complaint in any legal proceeding in which any allegation is made that
relates to warranty service described in this subsection. Such copy shall
be provided to the headquarters of such warrantor within ten calendar
days after such dealer receives such complaint.
(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) of this subsection do not apply for a
legal proceeding if a dealer does not comply with subdivision (c) of this
subsection.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c) of this subsection, a
dealer shall not fail to indemnify, defend, and hold harmless a warrantor
for which the dealer performed warranty service against any loss or
damage to the extent such loss or damage was caused by the negligence or
willful misconduct of such dealer.
(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c) of this subsection, such
warrantor shall provide to such dealer a copy of the complaint in any
legal proceeding in which any allegation is made that relates to warranty
service described in this subsection. Such copy shall be provided to the
headquarters of such dealer within ten calendar days after such warrantor
receives such complaint.
(c) Subdivision (a) of this subsection does not apply for a legal
proceeding if a warrantor does not comply with subdivision (b) of this
subsection.
(3) Indemnification under this section includes court costs,
reasonable attorney's fees, and expert witness fees.
Sec. 31. (1) If a new recreational vehicle is damaged prior to
transit to a dealer or is damaged in transit to a dealer and the carrier
-21-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
or means of transportation was selected by the manufacturer or
distributor, the dealer shall notify the manufacturer or distributor of
the damage within the timeframe specified in the manufacturer-dealer
agreement and:
(a) Request authorization from the manufacturer or distributor to
replace or correct any component, part, or accessory that was damaged; or
(b) Not take delivery of the recreational vehicle.
(2) The ownership of a new recreational vehicle described in
subsection (1) of this section reverts to the manufacturer or distributor
if:
(a) A dealer requests authorization under subdivision (1)(a) of this
section and the manufacturer or distributor refuses or fails to make such
authorization within ten business days after receiving the notification
described in subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) The dealer does not take delivery of the recreational vehicle.
(3) A dealer that takes custody of a recreational vehicle described
in subsection (1) of this section shall exercise due care with such
recreational vehicle, but such dealer shall have no other obligations,
financial or otherwise, with respect to such recreational vehicle.
(4)(a) For purposes of this subsection, unreasonable amount of miles
means any amount determined by the dealer that is not less than the sum
of:
(i) For recreational vehicles delivered from a manufacturer, one
hundred miles plus the shortest distance over paved roads beginning at
the location where the recreational vehicle was manufactured and ending
at the dealership location; or
(ii) For recreational vehicles delivered from a distributor, one
hundred miles plus the shortest distance over paved roads beginning from
the location where the recreational vehicle was manufactured, through the
location of the distributor, and ending at the dealership location.
(b) A dealer may choose to not take delivery of any new recreational
-22-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
vehicle if the odometer for such recreational vehicle indicates an
unreasonable amount of miles. The ownership of such recreational vehicle
shall revert to the manufacturer or distributor.
Sec. 32. (1) For purposes of this section, coerce includes, but is
not limited to:
(a) Threatening to initiate a termination action or not renew a
manufacturer-dealer agreement without good cause;
(b) Threatening to withhold any product as an inducement to amending
the manufacturer-dealer agreement; and
(c) Delaying the delivery of any product as an inducement to
amending the manufacturer-dealer agreement.
(2) A manufacturer or distributor shall not coerce or attempt to
coerce any dealer to:
(a) Purchase any product that the dealer did not order;
(b) Enter into any agreement with the manufacturer or distributor;
(c) Take any action that is unfair or unreasonable to the dealer;
(d) Enter into any agreement that requires the dealer to submit to
binding arbitration or otherwise waive any right or responsibility
provided under the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act; or
(e) Forego exercising a right authorized by a manufacturer-dealer
agreement or any law governing the manufacturer, distributor, or dealer.
(3) The dealer bears the burden of proof regarding any coercive
action by a manufacturer or distributor that is prohibited under this
section.
Sec. 33. (1)(a) A dealer, manufacturer, distributor, or warrantor
that is injured by a violation of the Recreational Vehicle Industry
Regulation Act may bring a civil action to recover actual damages.
(b) Venue for any civil action under this section shall be brought:
(i) If only one dealer is a party to the civil action, in the county
court of the county where the dealership is located;
(ii) If more than one dealer is a party to the civil action, in any
-23-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
county court of a county where a dealer that is a party to the action is
located; or
(iii) If no party to the civil action is a dealer, in any county
court with relevant jurisdiction.
(c) The court shall award attorney's fees and costs to the
prevailing party in such action.
(2)(a) Before bringing a civil action under this section, the party
that is bringing the civil action for an alleged violation shall serve a
written demand for mediation upon the offending party.
(b) The demand for mediation shall be served upon the offending
party via certified mail at the address:
(i) Stated within the manufacturer-dealer agreement between the
parties;
(ii) If there is no manufacturer-dealer agreement between the
parties or if the address described in subdivision (b)(i) of this
subsection does not exist or is no longer valid, the address specified by
the offending party in such party's license application under the
Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act.
(c) The demand for mediation shall contain a brief statement of the
dispute and the relief sought by the party serving the demand.
(d) Within twenty days after the date a demand for mediation is
served upon the offending party, the parties shall mutually select an
independent mediator and meet with the mediator for the purpose of
attempting to resolve the dispute. The meeting place shall be in this
state in a location selected by the mediator. The mediator may extend the
date of the mediation for good cause shown by either party or upon
stipulation of both parties.
(e) The service of a demand for mediation under this subsection
stays any statute of limitations or statute of repose for the filing of
any complaint, petition, protest, or action under the Recreational
Vehicle Industry Regulation Act until representatives of all parties have
-24-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
met with a mutually selected mediator for the purpose of attempting to
mediate the dispute. If a complaint, petition, protest, or action is
filed before such mediation, the court shall enter an order suspending
the proceeding or action until the mediation has occurred and may, upon
written stipulation of all parties to the proceeding or action that the
parties wish to continue to mediate under this subsection, enter an order
suspending the proceeding or action until a date that the court considers
appropriate. A suspension order issued under this subdivision may be
revoked by the court.
(f) The parties to the mediation shall bear their own costs for
attorney's fees and divide equally the cost of the mediator.
Sec. 34. (1)(a) A dealer, manufacturer, distributor, or warrantor
may bring a civil action in county court to seek injunctive relief
relating to a violation or a potential violation of the Recreational
Vehicle Industry Regulation Act or a manufacturer-dealer agreement.
(b) Venue for any civil action under this section shall be brought:
(i) If only one dealer is a party to the civil action, in the county
court of the county where the dealership is located;
(ii) If more than one dealer is a party to the civil action, in any
county court of a county where a dealer that is a party to the action is
located; or
(iii) If no party to the civil action is a dealer, in any county
court with relevant jurisdiction.
(2) After a hearing and if cause has been shown, the court may issue
a temporary or permanent injunction, or both, that restrains any person
from violating the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act or a
manufacturer-dealer agreement.
(3) Such injunction shall be issued without bond.
(4) A single act in violation of the Recreational Vehicle Industry
Regulation Act is sufficient to authorize the issuance of an injunction
under this section.
-25-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
Sec. 35. (1) The board may suspend or revoke the license of any
licensee under the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act upon a
finding that any such licensee has violated the Recreational Vehicle
Industry Regulation Act.
(2) The board may impose and collect a civil penalty against any
licensee if the board finds that such licensee has violated the
Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act. Such civil penalty shall
not exceed one thousand dollars for each violation of the Recreational
Vehicle Industry Regulation Act. All civil penalties received by the
board shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in
accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
(3) Any suspension, revocation, or imposition under this section may
be appealed by the licensee pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 36. Section 60-1402, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-1402 (1) The There is hereby established the Nebraska Motor
Vehicle Industry Licensing Board is created.
(2) The Board which shall consist of the Director of Motor Vehicles,
who shall be the chairperson of the board, and the following eleven nine
members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(a) One factory representative; ,
(b) One one member of the general public; ,
(c) One and one motorcycle dealer; , all of whom shall be appointed
from the state at large,
(d) One one new motor vehicle dealer from each of the three
congressional districts of the state as the districts existed are
constituted on October 19, 1963; ,
(e) Two and two used motor vehicle dealers. Not and one trailer
dealer or combination motor vehicle or trailer dealer, not more than one
used motor vehicle dealer shall be being appointed from the same
congressional district as such districts existed they are constituted on
-26-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
October 19, 1963; ,
(f) One and the trailer dealer or combination motor vehicle or
trailer dealer; being appointed from the state at large.
(g) One recreational vehicle dealer that is licensed under the
Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act; and
(h) One recreational vehicle manufacturer that is licensed under the
Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act.
(3) No member of the board shall participate in any manner in a
proceeding before the board involving his or her licensed business.
(4)(a) (2) On October 19, 1963, the Governor shall appoint a new
motor vehicle dealer and a trailer dealer or combination motor vehicle or
trailer dealer to the board. In making the appointments, the Governor
shall appoint one of the new members for one year and one for two years
as designated by the Governor in making the appointments.
(b) On January 1, 1972, the Governor shall appoint one factory
representative and one member of the general public to the board,
designating one to serve for a term of one year and one for a term of two
years.
(c) On January 1, 1974, the Governor shall appoint one motorcycle
dealer to serve for a term of three years.
(d) No later than January 1, 2027, the Governor shall appoint the
members described in subdivisions (2)(g) and (h) of this section. Such
members shall be appointed for terms of three years. Such three-year
terms shall begin on January 1, 2027.
(5)(a) At the expiration of the term of any appointed member of the
board, the Governor shall appoint a successor for a term of three years.
(b) In the event of a vacancy on the board, the Governor shall fill
such vacancy by appointing a member to serve during the unexpired term of
the member whose office has become vacant.
(c) No member appointed shall serve more than two consecutive terms.
(6) The action of the majority of the members of the board shall be
-27-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
deemed the action of the board.
(7) All appointments made to the board, except the Director of Motor
Vehicles, shall be confirmed by the Legislature if in session. In the
event the Legislature is not in session all appointments including
appointments to fill a vacancy shall be temporary appointments until the
next meeting of the Legislature when the Governor shall nominate some
person to fill the office. Any person so nominated who is confirmed by
the Legislature shall hold office during the remainder of the term.
(8) No appointed person may act as a member of the board while
holding any other elective or appointive state or federal office except
the Director of Motor Vehicles.
(9) All appointed members of the board shall be paid fifty dollars
for each day actually engaged in the performance of their duties and be
entitled to their reasonable traveling expenses in the performance of
their duties.
Sec. 37. Section 60-1438.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-1438.01 (1) For purposes of this section, manufacturer or
distributor includes (a) a factory representative or a distributor
representative or (b) a person who is affiliated with a manufacturer or
distributor or who, directly or indirectly through an intermediary, is
controlled by, or is under common control with, the manufacturer or
distributor. A person is controlled by a manufacturer or distributor if
the manufacturer or distributor has the authority directly or indirectly,
by law or by agreement of the parties, to direct or influence the
management and policies of the person. A franchise agreement with a
Nebraska-licensed dealer which conforms to and is subject to the Motor
Vehicle Industry Regulation Act is not control for purposes of this
section.
(2) Except as provided in this section, a manufacturer or
distributor shall not directly or indirectly:
-28-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
(a) Own an interest in a franchise, franchisee, or consumer care or
service facility, except that a manufacturer or distributor may hold
stock in a publicly held franchise, franchisee, or consumer care or
service facility so long as the manufacturer or distributor does not by
virtue of holding such stock operate or control the franchise,
franchisee, or consumer care or service facility;
(b) Operate or control a franchise, franchisee, or consumer care or
service facility;
(c) Act in the capacity of a franchisee or motor vehicle dealer; or
(d) Own, operate, or control any consumer care or service facility
or perform warranty or nonwarranty work on any vehicle manufactured by
such manufacturer or distributor, unless such manufacturer or
distributor:
(i) Manufactures and distributes electric vehicles; and
(ii) Is not nor has ever been a franchisor in this state.
(3) A manufacturer or distributor may own an interest in a
franchisee or otherwise control a franchise for a period not to exceed
twelve months after the date the manufacturer or distributor acquires the
franchise if:
(a) The person from whom the manufacturer or distributor acquired
the franchise was a franchisee; and
(b) The franchise is for sale by the manufacturer or distributor.
(4) For purposes of broadening the diversity of its franchisees and
enhancing opportunities for qualified persons who lack the resources to
purchase a franchise outright, but for no other purpose, a manufacturer
or distributor may temporarily own an interest in a franchise if the
manufacturer's or distributor's participation in the franchise is in a
bona fide relationship with a franchisee and the franchisee:
(a) Has made a significant investment in the franchise, which
investment is subject to loss;
(b) Has an ownership interest in the franchise; and
-29-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
(c) Operates the franchise under a plan to acquire full ownership of
the franchise within a reasonable time and under reasonable terms and
conditions.
(5) On a showing of good cause by a manufacturer or distributor, the
board may extend the time limit set forth in subsection (3) of this
section. An extension may not exceed twelve months. An application for an
extension after the first extension is granted is subject to protest by a
franchisee of the same line-make whose franchise is located in the same
community as the franchise owned or controlled by the manufacturer or
distributor.
(6) The prohibition in subdivision (2)(b) of this section shall not
apply to any manufacturer of manufactured housing , recreational
vehicles, or trailers.
(7) The prohibitions set forth in subsection (2) of this section
shall not apply to a manufacturer that:
(a) Does not own or operate more than two such dealers or dealership
locations in this state;
(b) Owned, operated, or controlled a warranty repair or service
facility in this state as of January 1, 2016;
(c) Manufactures engines for installation in a motor-driven vehicle
with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than sixteen thousand pounds
for which motor-driven vehicle evidence of title is required as a
condition precedent to registration under the laws of this state, if the
manufacturer is not otherwise a manufacturer of motor vehicles; and
(d) Provides to dealers on substantially equal terms access to all
support for completing repairs, including, but not limited to, parts and
assemblies, training and technical service bulletins, and other
information concerning repairs that the manufacturer provides to
facilities owned, operated, or controlled by the manufacturer.
Sec. 38. Section 60-2701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-30-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
60-2701 As used in sections 60-2701 to 60-2709, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Consumer means shall mean the purchaser, other than for purposes
of resale, of a motor vehicle normally used for personal, family,
household, or business purposes, any person to whom such motor vehicle is
transferred for the same purposes during the duration of an express
warranty applicable to such motor vehicle, and any other person entitled
by the terms of such warranty to enforce the obligations of the warranty;
(2) Motor vehicle means shall mean a new motor vehicle as defined in
section 60-1401.30 that which is sold in this state, excluding
recreational vehicles as defined in section 4 of this act section 60-347;
and
(3) Manufacturer's express warranty means shall mean the written
warranty, so labeled, of the manufacturer of a new motor vehicle.
Sec. 39. Section 71-4603, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-4603 For purposes of the Uniform Standard Code for Manufactured
Homes and Recreational Vehicles, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Camping trailer means a vehicular portable unit mounted on
wheels and constructed with collapsible partial side walls which fold for
towing by another vehicle and unfold at the campsite to provide temporary
living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use;
(2) Commission means the Public Service Commission;
(3) Dealer means any of the following a person licensed by the state
pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act as a dealer in
manufactured homes or recreational vehicles or any other person, other
than a manufacturer, who sells, offers to sell, distributes, or leases
manufactured homes or recreational vehicles primarily to persons who in
good faith purchase or lease a manufactured home or recreational vehicle
for purposes other than resale: ;
(a) A person licensed by the state pursuant to the Motor Vehicle
-31-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
Industry Regulation Act as a dealer in manufactured homes;
(b) A person licensed by the state pursuant to the Recreational
Vehicle Industry Regulation Act as a dealer in recreational vehicles; or
(c) Any other person, other than a manufacturer;
(4) Defect means a failure to conform to an applicable construction
standard that renders the manufactured home or recreational vehicle or
any component of the manufactured home or recreational vehicle not fit
for the ordinary use for which it was intended but does not result in an
unreasonable risk of injury or death to occupants;
(5) Distributor means any person engaged in the sale and
distribution of manufactured homes or recreational vehicles for resale;
(6) Failure to conform means a defect, a serious defect,
noncompliance, or an imminent safety hazard related to the code;
(7) Fifth-wheel trailer means a unit mounted on wheels, designed to
provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel
use, of such size or weight as not to require a special highway movement
permit, and designed to be towed by a motorized vehicle that contains a
towing mechanism that is mounted above or forward of the tow vehicle's
rear axle;
(8) Gross trailer area means the total plan area measured on the
exterior to the maximum horizontal projections of exterior wall in the
setup mode and includes all siding, corner trims, moldings, storage
spaces, expandable room sections regardless of height, and areas enclosed
by windows but does not include roof overhangs. Storage lofts contained
within the basic unit shall have ceiling heights less than five feet and
shall not constitute additional square footage. Appurtenances, as defined
in subdivision (2)(k) of section 60-6,288, shall not be considered in
calculating the gross trailer area as provided in such subdivision;
(9) Imminent safety hazard means a hazard that presents an imminent
and unreasonable risk of death or severe personal injury;
(10) Manufactured home means a structure, transportable in one or
-32-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
more sections, which in the traveling mode is eight body feet or more in
width or forty body feet or more in length or when erected on site is
three hundred twenty or more square feet and which is built on a
permanent chassis and designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a
permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities and
includes the plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and electrical systems
contained in the structure, except that manufactured home includes any
structure that meets all of the requirements of this subdivision other
than the size requirements and with respect to which the manufacturer
voluntarily files a certification required by the United States Secretary
of Housing and Urban Development and complies with the standards
established under the National Manufactured Housing Construction and
Safety Standards Act of 1974, as such act existed on September 1, 2001,
42 U.S.C. 5401 et seq.;
(11) Manufactured-home construction means all activities relating to
the assembly and manufacture of a manufactured home, including, but not
limited to, activities relating to durability, quality, and safety;
(12) Manufactured-home safety means the performance of a
manufactured home in such a manner that the public is protected against
any unreasonable risk of the occurrence of accidents due to the design or
construction of such manufactured home or any unreasonable risk of death
or injury to the user or to the public if such accidents do occur;
(13) Manufacturer means any person engaged in manufacturing,
assembling, or completing manufactured homes or recreational vehicles;
(14) Motor home means a vehicular unit primarily designed to provide
temporary living quarters which are built into an integral part of, or
permanently attached to, a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis or van,
containing permanently installed independent life-support systems that
meet the state standard for recreational vehicles and providing at least
four of the following facilities: Cooking; refrigeration or ice box;
self-contained toilet; heating, air conditioning, or both; a potable
-33-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
water supply system including a faucet and sink; separate one-hundred-
twenty-nominal-volt electrical power supply; or LP gas supply;
(15) Noncompliance means a failure to comply with an applicable
construction standard that does not constitute a defect, a serious
defect, or an imminent safety hazard;
(16) Park model recreational vehicle means a vehicular unit which
meets the following criteria:
(a) Is designed and marketed as temporary living quarters for
recreational, camping, travel, or seasonal use;
(b) Is not permanently affixed to real property for use as a
permanent dwelling;
(c) Is built on a single chassis mounted on wheels with a gross
trailer area not exceeding four hundred square feet in the set up mode;
and
(d) Is certified by the manufacturer as complying with the ANSI
A119.5 Park Model Recreational Vehicle Standard of the American National
Standards Institute, 2020 edition;
(17) Person means any individual, partnership, limited liability
company, company, corporation, or association engaged in manufacturing,
selling, offering to sell, or leasing manufactured homes or recreational
vehicles;
(18) Purchaser means the first person purchasing a manufactured home
or recreational vehicle in good faith for purposes other than resale;
(19) Recreational vehicle means a vehicular type unit primarily
designed as temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or
travel use, which unit either has its own motive power or is mounted on
or towed by another vehicle. Recreational vehicle includes, but is not
limited to, travel trailer, park model recreational vehicle, camping
trailer, truck camper, motor home, and van conversion;
(20) Seal means a device or insignia issued by the Department of
Health and Human Services Regulation and Licensure prior to May 1, 1998,
-34-

LB1121 LB1121
2026 2026
or by the Public Service Commission on or after May 1, 1998, to be
displayed on the exterior of a manufactured home or recreational vehicle
to evidence compliance with state standards. The federal manufactured-
home label shall be recognized as a seal;
(21) Serious defect means a failure to conform to an applicable
construction standard that renders the manufactured home or recreational
vehicle or any component of the manufactured home or recreational vehicle
not fit for the ordinary use for which it was intended and which results
in an unreasonable risk of injury or death to the occupants;
(22) Travel trailer means a vehicular unit mounted on wheels,
designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping,
or travel use of such size or weight as not to require special highway
movement permits when towed by a motorized vehicle;
(23) Truck camper means a portable unit constructed to provide
temporary living quarters for recreational, travel, or camping use,
consisting of a roof, floor, and sides and designed to be loaded onto and
unloaded from the bed of a pickup truck; and
(24) Van conversion means a completed vehicle permanently altered
cosmetically, structurally, or both which has been recertified by the
state as a multipurpose passenger vehicle but which does not conform to
or otherwise meet the definition of a motor home in this section and
which contains at least one plumbing, heating, or one-hundred-twenty-
nominal-volt electrical component subject to the provisions of the state
standard for recreational vehicles. Van conversion does not include any
such vehicle that lacks any plumbing, heating, or one-hundred-twenty-
nominal-volt electrical system but contains an extension of the low-
voltage automotive circuitry.
Sec. 40. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2026.
Sec. 41. Original sections 60-1402 and 60-2701, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 60-1438.01 and 71-4603, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-35-